Tennessee, session 114, SB0627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-206(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the semicolon at the end of the subdivision and substituting:
, not to exceed the registry's actual cost of producing such copies;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0627
000880
- 1 -